Utah statutes.
4-37-108.   Prohibited activities.

(1)  Except as provided in this chapter, in the rules of the department made pursuant to Section 4-37-109, rules of the Fish Health Policy Board made pursuant to Section 4-37-503, or in the rules of the Wildlife Board governing species of aquatic animals which may be imported into, possessed, or transported within the state, a person may not:

(a)  acquire, import, or possess aquatic animals intended for use in an aquaculture or fee fishing facility;

(b)  transport aquatic animals to or from an aquaculture or fee fishing facility;

(c)  stock or propagate aquatic animals in an aquaculture or fee fishing facility; or

(d)  harvest, transfer, or sell aquatic animals from an aquaculture or fee fishing facility.

(2)  If a person commits an act in violation of Subsection (1) and that same act constitutes wanton destruction of protected wildlife as provided in Section 23-20-4, the person is guilty of a violation of Section 23-20-4.



Amended by Chapter 302, 1998 General Session

